Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-795
Quarantined area; additional animals; bureau notified.

The bureau shall be notified whenever additional animals are placed within a quarantined area, and such quarantine may be amended accordingly by the bureau.

Laws 1975, LB 321, § 15.